src/verbs/group-3-verbs.lexc
LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_endre_andre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^nde				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ndes			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^nde				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ndions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ndiez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ndent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^ndisse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^ndisses			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^ndît			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^ndissions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^ndissiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^ndissent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_endre_andre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^ndrais			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ndrais			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^ndrait			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ndrions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ndriez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ndraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_endre_andre
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^nds				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ndons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ndez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_ondre
ondre+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_ondre;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_ondre
+Inf:ondre					#;
+PPre:ondant				#;
+PPas:ondu					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_ondre;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_ondre;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_ondre;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_ondre;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_ondre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^onds			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^onds			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^ond				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ondons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ondez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ondent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^ondais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^ondais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^ondait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^ondions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^ondiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^ondaient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^ondis			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^ondis			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^ondit			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^ondîmes		#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^ondîtes		#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^ondirent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^ondrai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^ondras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^ondra			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^ondrons			#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^ondrez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^ondront			#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_ondre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^onde			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ondes			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^onde			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ondions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ondiez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ondent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^ondisse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^ondisses		#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^ondît			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^ondissions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^ondissiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^ondissent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_ondre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^ondrais			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ondrais			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^ondrait			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ondrions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ondriez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ondraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_ondre
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^onds			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ondons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ondez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_indre
indre+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_indre;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_indre
+Inf:indre					#;
+PPre:ignant				#;
+PPas:int					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_indre;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_indre;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_indre;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_indre;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_indre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^ins				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ins				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^int				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ignons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ignez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ignent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^ignais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^ignais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^ignait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^ignions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^igniez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^ignaient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^ignis			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^ignis			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^ignit			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^ignîmes		#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^ignîtes		#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^ignirent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^indrai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^indras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^indra			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^indrons			#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^indrez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^indront			#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_indre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^igne			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ignes			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^igne			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ignions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^igniez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ignent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^ignisse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^ignisses		#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^ignît			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^ignissions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^ignissiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^ignissent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_indre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^indrais			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^indrais			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^indrait			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^indrions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^indriez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^indraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_indre
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ins				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ignons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ignez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_moudre
moudre+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_moudre;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_moudre
+Inf:moudre					#;
+PPre:lant					#;
+PPas:moulu					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_moudre;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_moudre;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_moudre;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_moudre;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_moudre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^mouds			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^mouds			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^moud			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^moulons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^moulez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^moulent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^moulais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^moulais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^moulait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^moulions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^mouliez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^moulaient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^moulus			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^moulus			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^moulut			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^moulûmes		#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^moulûtes		#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^moulurent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^moudrai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^moudras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^moudra			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^moudrons		#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^moudrez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^moudront		#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_moudre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^moule			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^moules			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^moule			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^moulions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^mouliez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^moulent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^moulusse		#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^moulusses		#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^moulût			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^moulussions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^moulussiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^moulussent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_moudre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^moudrais		#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^moudrais		#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^moudrait		#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^moudrions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^moudriez		#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^moudraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_moudre
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^mouds			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^moulons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^moulez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_coudre
coudre+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_coudre;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_coudre
+Inf:coudre					#;
+PPre:cousant				#;
+PPas:cousu					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_coudre;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_coudre;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_coudre;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_coudre;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_coudre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^couds			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^couds			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^coud			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^cousons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^cousez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^cousent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^cousais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^cousais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^cousait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^cousions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^cousiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^cousaient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^cousis			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^cousis			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^cousit			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^cousîmes		#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^cousîtes		#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^cousirent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^coudrai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^coudras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^coudra			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^coudrons		#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^coudrez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^coudront		#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_coudre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^couse			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^couses			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^couse			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^cousions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^cousiez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^cousent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^cousisse		#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^cousisses		#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^cousît			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^cousissions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^cousissiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^cousissent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_coudre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^coudrais		#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^coudrais		#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^coudrait		#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^coudrions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^coudriez		#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^coudraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_coudre
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^couds			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^cousons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^cousez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_crire
crire+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_crire;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_crire
+Inf:crire					#;
+PPre:crivant				#;
+PPas:crit					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_crire;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_crire;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_crire;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_crire;

LEXICON Group3_stem
conf	Group3_suffix_ondre;
corresp	Group3_suffix_ondre;
f		Group3_suffix_ondre;
p		Group3_suffix_ondre;
ref		Group3_suffix_ondre;
rép		Group3_suffix_ondre;
t		Group3_suffix_ondre;
astre	Group3_suffix_indre;
atte	Group3_suffix_indre;
ce		Group3_suffix_indre;
contra	Group3_suffix_indre;
cra		Group3_suffix_indre;
dépe	Group3_suffix_indre;
déte	Group3_suffix_indre;
empre	Group3_suffix_indre;
ence	Group3_suffix_indre;
enfre	Group3_suffix_indre;
fe		Group3_suffix_indre;
ge		Group3_suffix_indre;
pe		Group3_suffix_indre;
pla		Group3_suffix_indre;
repe	Group3_suffix_indre;
restre	Group3_suffix_indre;
rete	Group3_suffix_indre;
te		Group3_suffix_indre;
éte		Group3_suffix_indre;
étre	Group3_suffix_indre;
jo		Group3_suffix_indre;
o		Group3_suffix_indre;
po		Group3_suffix_indre;
rejo	Group3_suffix_indre;
adjo	Group3_suffix_indre;
disjo	Group3_suffix_indre;
conjo	Group3_suffix_indre;
enjo	Group3_suffix_indre;
é		Group3_suffix_moudre;
re		Group3_suffix_moudre;
dé		Group3_suffix_coudre;
re		Group3_suffix_coudre;
circons	Group3_suffix_crire;
dé		Group3_suffix_crire;
ins		Group3_suffix_crire;
pres	Group3_suffix_crire;
pros	Group3_suffix_crire;
retrans	Group3_suffix_crire;
ré		Group3_suffix_crire;
sous	Group3_suffix_crire;
trans	Group3_suffix_crire;
é		Group3_suffix_crire;
